Utah statutes.
57-11-6.   Application for registration -- Required documents and
information -- Filing fee and deposit -- Consolidation of registration of
additional lands -- Reports of changes.
(1)  The application for registration of subdivided lands shall be filed as
prescribed by the division's rules and, unless otherwise provided by the
division, shall include, but is not limited to, the following documents and
information:
(a)  an irrevocable appointment of the division to receive service of any
lawful process in any noncriminal proceeding arising under this chapter
against the applicant or his personal representative;
(b)  a legal description of the subdivided lands offered for registration,
together with a map showing the division proposed or made, the dimensions of
the units, and the relation of the subdivided lands to existing streets,
roads, and other off-site improvements;
(c)  the states or jurisdictions, including the United States, in which an
application for registration or similar document has been filed, and a copy of
any adverse order, judgment, or decree entered in connection with the
subdivided lands by the regulatory authorities in each jurisdiction or by any
court;
(d)  the applicant's name and address, and the form, date, and jurisdiction of
organization; the address of each of its offices in this state; and the name
and address of the individual to whom the applicant wishes to have the
division direct all communications;
(e)  the name, address, and principal occupation for the past five years of
every director, officer, or general partner of the applicant or person
occupying a similar status or performing similar functions; the extent and
nature of his interest in the applicant or the subdivided lands as of a
specified date within 30 days of the filing of the application;
(f)  a statement, in a form acceptable to the division, of the condition of
the title to the subdivided lands, including encumbrances, as of a specified
date within 30 days of the date of application, which statement:
(i)  if the subdivided lands are situated in this state, shall be in the form
of a title opinion from a title insurer qualified to engage in the title
insurance business in this state or an opinion of an attorney, licensed to
practice in this state and who is not a salaried employee, officer, or
director of the applicant or owner;
(ii)  if the subdivided lands are situated in another jurisdiction, shall be
in the form of an opinion of an attorney licensed to practice in the
jurisdiction where the lands are situated and who is not a salaried employee,
officer, or director of the applicant or owner; or
(iii)  may be substituted by other evidence of title acceptable to the
division;
(g)  copies of the instruments which will be delivered to a purchaser to
evidence his interest in the subdivided lands and of the contracts and other
agreements which a purchaser will be required to agree to or sign;
(h)  copies of the instruments by which the interest in the subdivided lands
to be disposed of to the purchaser was acquired and a statement of any lien or
encumbrance upon the title and copies of the instruments creating the lien or
encumbrance, if any, with recording data, but if any of these instruments
contain any information relating to the consideration paid upon the prior
acquisition of the subdivided lands, this information may be blocked out;
(i)  if there is a lien or encumbrance affecting more than one unit, a
statement of the consequences to a purchaser of failure to discharge the lien
or encumbrance and the steps, if any, taken to protect the purchaser in case
of this eventuality;
(j)  copies of instruments creating easements, restrictions, or other
encumbrances affecting the subdivided lands;
(k)   a statement of the zoning and other governmental regulations affecting
the use of the subdivided lands and of any existing or proposed taxes or
special assessments which affect the subdivided lands;
(l) (i)  if the subdivided lands are situated in this state, and unless all
lands to be disposed of are included on a subdivision plat map which has been
filed and approved pursuant to Title 17, an opinion by an attorney, licensed
to practice in this state and who is not a salaried employee, officer, or
director of the applicant or owner, that:
(A)  the division proposed or made does not or will not violate any existing
state statute or local ordinance; and
(B)  all permits or approvals have been obtained from the applicable state or
local authorities necessary for the subdivided lands to be put to the use for
which they are offered, except for those permits or approvals which will not
be granted until the subdivided lands are registered under this chapter if
this registration is the only condition precedent to the granting of the
permits or approvals; or
(ii)  if the subdivided lands are situated in another jurisdiction, an opinion
by an attorney licensed to practice in that jurisdiction and who is not a
salaried employee, officer, or director of the applicant or owner, that the
division proposed or made does not violate any existing statute, ordinance, or
other law;
(m)  a statement of the existing provisions for access, sewage disposal, water
(including a supply of culinary water), and other public utilities in the
subdivision and, if they are not presently available but are feasible, the
estimated cost to the purchaser of their procurement;
(n)  a statement of any improvements to be installed, the schedule for their
completion, any provisions for maintenance of those improvements, and
estimated costs to the purchaser;
(o)  a statement declaring whether or not the applicant is or will be
representing, in connection with an offer or disposition of land, that
culinary water service will be available to or on the subdivided lands, and if
the applicant is or will be so representing:
(i)  a statement as to what entity will be providing the culinary water
service and the nature of the entity; and
(ii)  if the entity providing the service is not a municipal system, a
certificate from the Public Service Commission that the entity providing the
culinary water service either holds a certificate of convenience and necessity
from the commission, or has been found by the Public Service Commission to be
exempt from its jurisdiction;
(p)  a narrative description of the promotional plan for the disposition of
the subdivided lands together with copies of all advertising material which
has been prepared for public distribution by any means of communication;
(q)  the proposed public offering statement;
(r)  a copy of every public report or public offering statement or similar
document filed with or issued by any agency of the United States or any state
or jurisdiction; and
(s)  any other reasonable information, including any current financial
statement, which the division by its rules requires for the protection of
purchasers.
(2)  Each application for registration of subdivided lands shall be
accompanied by a filing fee of $500 for up to 30 units, plus an additional $3
per unit for each unit over 30 units up to a maximum of $2,500 for each
application, and a deposit of $300 to cover all on-site inspection costs and
expenses incurred by the division.  If the $300 deposit is insufficient to
meet the estimated costs and expenses of the on-site inspection, the applicant
or owner shall make an additional deposit sufficient to cover the estimated
costs and expenses before the division will inspect the subdivided lands.  The
deposit shall be refunded to the extent it is not used, together with an
itemized statement from the division of all amounts it has used.
(3)  In the event the subdivider registers additional subdivided lands to be
offered for disposition, he may consolidate the subsequent registration with
any earlier registration offering subdividing lands for disposition under the
same promotional plan by filing an application for consolidation accompanied
by an additional fee of $200, plus $3 for each additional unit, up to a
maximum of $1,250 for each application, if at the time the subdivider makes
the application all of the information required by Subsection (1) of this
section has been brought current and covers the additional subdivided lands.
(4)  The subdivider shall report any material change in the information
contained in an application for registration or consolidation within 15 days
from the time that change becomes known to him.
